apertium-eo-en.eo.dix.xml
<pardef n="quant2__det">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>








<pardef n="ser__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>i</l>                   <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>as</l>                  <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>is</l>                  <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>os</l>                  <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>us</l>                  <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>us</l>                  <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>ita</l>                 <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ita</l>                 <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itaj</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itan</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itajn</l>               <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>onta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ontaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>intaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>u</l>                   <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
   
<pardef n="pov/i__vaux">
<e>                           <p><l>i</l>                   <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>as</l>                  <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>is</l>                  <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>os</l>                  <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>us</l>                  <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>us</l>                  <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ita</l>                 <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itaj</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itan</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itajn</l>               <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>onta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ontaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>intaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>u</l>                   <r>i<s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
 

<pardef n="verb__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>i</l>                   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>as</l>                  <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>is</l>                  <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>os</l>                  <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>us</l>                  <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>us</l>                  <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>ita</l>                 <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ita</l>                 <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itaj</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itan</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itajn</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>onta</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ontaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>intaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>u</l>                   <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="tiom da">              <i>tiom<b/>da</i><par n="quant2__det"/></e>
<e lm="tiom multe">           <i>tiom<b/>multe</i><par n="quant2__det"/></e>
<e lm="tiom multe da">        <i>tiom<b/>multe<b/>da</i><par n="quant2__det"/></e>
<e lm="esti">                 <i>est</i><par n="ser__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="povi">                 <i>pov</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="devi">                 <i>dev</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="voli">                 <i>vol</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="ebli">                 <i>ebl</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="voli"><i>vol</i><par n="pov/i__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="anonci">               <i>anonc</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bruli">                <i>brul</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dikiĝi">               <i>diki</i><par n="ĝ"/><i></i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="elŝalti">              <i>el</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>alt</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flanklasi">            <i>flanklas</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="honori">               <i>honor</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kisi">                 <i>kis</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kontentigi">           <i>kontentig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="moderiĝi">             <i>moderi</i><par n="ĝ"/><i></i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prirabi">              <i>prirab</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sinkronigi">           <i>sinkronig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blindi">               <i>blind</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="elpeli">               <i>elpel</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pliiĝi">               <i>plii</i><par n="ĝ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aparteniĝi">           <i>aparteni</i><par n="ĝ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="surpreni">             <i>surpren</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kateni">               <i>katen</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pagigi">               <i>pagig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kompromisi">           <i>kompromis</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kaŭri">                <i>ka</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>r</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="detroniĝi">            <i>detroni</i><par n="ĝ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refuti">               <i>refut</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ekscitegi">            <i>eksciteg</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ekskluzivi">           <i>ekskluziv</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flirtigi">             <i>flirtig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grumbli">              <i>grumbl</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ŝveligi">              <par n="ŝ"/><i>velig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plaŭdeti">             <i>pla</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>det</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mimi">                 <i>mim</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="senfortiĝi">           <i>senforti</i><par n="ĝ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="posteni">              <i>posten</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eduki">                <i>eduk</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refari">               <i>refar</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rustiĝi">              <i>rusti</i><par n="ĝ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ŝoki">                 <par n="ŝ"/><i>ok</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="superverŝiĝi">         <i>superver</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>i</i><par n="ĝ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sublimigi">            <i>sublimig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="paŭsi">                <i>pa</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>s</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vibrigi">              <i>vibrig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="partigi">              <i>partig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="konfidi">              <i>konfid</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inundi">               <i>inund</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="malfierigi">           <i>malfierig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ofendegi">             <i>ofendeg</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="retrovi">              <i>retrov</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amasbuĉadi">           <i>amasbu</i><par n="ĉ"/><i>ad</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="senbridigi">           <i>senbridig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
